Washington statutes.
RCW 15.135.050

Voluntary compliance program.

(1) The department may establish a voluntary program for farms exempt or partially exempt from the produce safety rule to verify that such farms comply with the rule. This includes, but is not limited to, conducting the compliance verification activities under RCW 15.135.060.

(2) Farms participating in the voluntary compliance program must bear the cost of the program. The director must periodically adopt, by rule, fees of no more than is necessary to defray costs of compliance verification activities and program administration.

[ 2018 c 106 s 5.]